apertium-sme-nob.sme.lexc
LEXICON Rreal ! This is the former R lexicon, renamed to avoid the MiddleNouns loop
                     @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@# Noun ;                      ! This is the normal case.		         
      @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@# Verb ;       ! Flag diacr declares that the compound   
      @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@# Adjective ;  ! needs a N tag later in the derivation  
                @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@%- Noun ;                     ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so     
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@%- Verb ;      ! Sem-julggaštus and maana-gåetie	      
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@%- Adjective ; ! are allowed.			              

 @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@%-# Acronym ;    ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
 @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@%-# Numeral ;    ! maana-123
 @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@%-# ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for non-hyph.
                                                                                                       ! words. viessu-London goes through here.

  @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@%-# HyphNouns ; ! Go to words requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-

 +RCmpnd@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@:%-@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@ ENDLEX ;     ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller
 R-LAGAN ;


LEXICON RHyph ! Recursive lexicon from all classes REQUIRING a hyphen to follow.
              ! NBNBNB!!! The hyphen should be added here! NOT in the other lexicons!

                +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Noun;                                     ! This is the normal case.
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-# Verb;       ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-# Adjective ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation

 +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Acronym ;    ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
 +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Numeral ;    ! NRK-2
 +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for hyph-words.
                               ! London-Hull is covered here, whereas Hull-viessu
                               ! is covered by RHyph + Noun.

 +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# HyphNouns ; ! Go to words requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-

 +RCmpnd:%- ENDLEX ;      ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

! Proper noun compounds without hyphens are NOT presently covered - if they were
! to be added, they need to be marked +Use/Sub. Examples: LondonHull & viessuLondon.


LEXICON Rnoun
 Rreal ;                   ! Going to the compound lexicon
 +N+Attr+Use/Sub: ENDLEX ; ! Kárášjot, as independent (sub) word

LEXICON R-LAGAN
 +Der1+Der2+Der/lágan+Use/Circ:»lágan LAGAN ; ! ! biilalágan, 
   ! noaidelágán noaiddilágán beatnagalágán beanalágán all these goes
  ! Nielsen:beatnatlágán, beatnatlágáš, beanalágáš, giđalágáš, áhččelágáš,
 +Der1+Der2+Der/lágán+Use/Circ:»lágán LAGAN ; ! ! Oslolágán
 +Der1+Der2+Der/lágaš+Use/Circ:»lágaž LAGAN ; ! ! etc.
 +Der1+Der2+Der/lágáš+Use/Circ:»lágáž LAGAN ;


! Lexica for nominal declension classes
! =====================================

! Lexica for nouns
! ----------------

! Bisyllabic nouns
! - - - - - - - -

LEXICON GOAHTI-A ! pga errortag-branch
 GOAHTI ;

LEXICON GOAHTI-I  ! pga errortag-branch
 GOAHTI-IU ;

LEXICON GOAHTI-U  ! pga errortag-branch
 GOAHTI-IU ;


LEXICON GOAHTI !Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON GOAHTI-IU !Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%> GOAHTI-IU-OBL ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON GOAHTILONG !Long nom-compound-forms,long gen
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv:»viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Use/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N+Use/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON GOAHTILONGSHORT !Sometimes long nom-compound-forms,long gen
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Use/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Use/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)
! +N+SgGenCmp:%>X8 R ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON ALBMI !Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7viđá K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Use/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Use/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>X8 K ; ! 
 +N+Use/Sub:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! short gen comp
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON ALBMILONG !Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Use/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Use/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N+Sg+Gen:%>X8 K ;  ! ^NG^
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON ALBMILONGSHORT !Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Use/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Use/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N+Sg+Gen:%>X8 K ;  ! ^NG^
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON Noun
bargo#sadji+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:bargo#sad'ji ALBMI ;
bihce#báhce:bihce#báh'ce GOAHTI ;
biigá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:bij'gá ALBMILONG ;
biila#gávpi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG+Org+Plc:biila#gáv'pi GOAHTI-I ;
biila#uksa:biila#uk'sa GOAHTI-A ;
birra#johtu:birra#joh'tu GOAHTILONG ;
bivvu GOAHTI-U ;
boazo#doallo#guovlu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:boazo#doallo#guov'lu ALBMI ;
bonte:bon'te GOAHTI ;
bušeahtta#dilli ALBMILONGSHORT ;
báhčin#bálká:báhčin#bál'ká ALBMILONG ;
bálse#báhti:bálse#báh'ti GOAHTI-I ;
bánno:bán'no GOAHTI ;
bátne#stággu GOAHTI-U ;
darda:dar'da GOAHTI-A ;
digge#riekti:digge#riek'ti ALBMI ;
diksu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:dik'su GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
duŋke:duŋ'ke GOAHTI ;
dušši:duš'ši ALBMILONG ;
dáhppa#ráigi:dáhppa#ráj'gi GOAHTI-I ;
eaiggáduššan#háldu:eaiggáduššan#hál'du GOAHTI-U ;
eallin#oaidno#diehtu:eallin#oaidno#dieh'tu ALBMI ;
eana#opmodat#rádjá+Plc:eana#opmodat#rád'já ALBMILONGSHORT ;
eatni#giella GOAHTI-A ;
gaska#fiervá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Time:gaska#fier'vá ALBMILONG ;
geahče#rádjá+Plc:geahče#rád'já ALBMILONGSHORT ;
geailu:geaj'lu GOAHTI-U ;
geavli:geav'li GOAHTI-I ;
gieldda#dearvvašvuođa#bálvalus#láhka:gieldda#dearvvašvuođa#bálvalus#láh'ka GOAHTI-A ;
gieldo#linnjá:gieldo#lin'njá GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
goahcan#bircu:goahcan#bir'cu ALBMILONGSHORT ;
gudne#miel#lahttu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:gudne#miel#lahttu GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
guoddá ALBMILONG ;
guolle#avvi GOAHTI-I ;
guolle#gonte:guolle#gon'te GOAHTI ;
guolástan#guovlu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:guolástan#guov'lu ALBMI ;
gádde#linjá:gádde#lin'já GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
gádnu GOAHTI-U ;
gávpe#johtu:gávpe#joh'tu GOAHTILONG ;
hallusinogena GOAHTI-A ; !^LOAN
horbmá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Plant:horbmá ALBMILONG ;
indeksa#lohku+Use/Sub:indeksa#loh'ku ALBMILONGSHORT ;
jarri GOAHTI-I ;
johtolat#bargu:johtolat#bar'gu ALBMI ;
johtu:joh'tu GOAHTILONG ; !Actually the short form is more used, f. ex. johtopokála, only once johtupokála
jorri:jorri¤ ALBMILONGSHORT ;
jođas#spáitu:jođas#spáj'tu GOAHTI-U ;
juovla#koarta:juovla#koar'ta GOAHTI-A ;
jáldo#skábe GOAHTI ;
lahttu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Org:lahttu GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
leakšá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:leak'šá ALBMILONG ;
leaŋka:leaŋ'ka GOAHTI-A ;
liige#gása#revre:liige#gása#rev're GOAHTI ;
linjá:lin'já GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
ludni GOAHTI-I ;
luodd#earru+Use/Sub:luodd9#earru GOAHTI-U ;
luodda#linnjá:luodda#lin'njá GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
luvven#bircu:luvven#bir'cu ALBMILONGSHORT ;
lága#mánne#riekti:lága#mánne#riek'ti ALBMI ;
maori+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ma^ori ALBMILONG ;
miel#lahttu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Plc:miel#lahttu GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
molekyla GOAHTI-A ;
monne#cearki:monne#cear'ki GOAHTI-I ;
muddu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Time:muddu GOAHTI-U ;
máttar#áddjá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:máttar#áddjá ALBMILONG ;
namma#riekti:namma#riek'ti ALBMI ;
návste:návs'te GOAHTI ;
oahppo#neavvo#bádji+Time:oahppo#neavvo#bád'ji GOAHTI-I ;
oaive#čohkka GOAHTI-A ;
oidu:oj'du GOAHTI-U ;
olggos#gollu GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
olli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:olli ALBMILONG ;
orrun#dilli ALBMILONGSHORT ;
privat#kapitalisma+Use/Sub:privat#kapitalis'ma GOAHTI-A ; !^LOAN !
rievssat#bivdu:rievssat#biv'du ALBMI ;
roamši:roam'ši GOAHTI-I ;
roassu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Wthr:roassu GOAHTI-U ;
roggan#reive:roggan#rej've GOAHTI ;
rádjá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Plc:rád'já ALBMILONGSHORT ;
sis#bandy GOAHTI ;
siskkáldas#reantu:siskkáldas#rean'tu GOAHTI-U ;
spárka+Plc:spár'ka GOAHTI-A ;
summá:sum'má ALBMILONG ;
sundi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:sundi¤ ALBMI ;
suorre#sággi GOAHTI-I ;
sáhttu GOAHTI-U ;
táksi+Use/NG:táksi GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
unnit#lohku+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Group:unnit#loh'ku ALBMILONGSHORT ;
verdde+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:verdde GOAHTI ;
vuordin#lassi GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
vuostá:vuos'tá ALBMILONGSHORT ;
váldo#bohcci:váldo#bohcci¤ ALBMI ;
várre#lahttu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:várre#láhttu GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
wagnerianisma:wagneri^anis'ma GOAHTI-A ; !^LOAN
árvo#johtu:árvo#joh'tu GOAHTILONG ;
átŋu+Use/Sub:átŋu GOAHTI-U ;
šiehtadallan#bealli GOAHTI-I ;
šiehtadallan#dilli ALBMILONGSHORT ;
šiehtadallan#fáddá ALBMILONG ;
čáhce#bumpe:čáhce#bum'pe GOAHTI ;
čáskadan#bohcci:čáskadan#bohcci¤ ALBMI ;
